Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.422

Private use single-axle trailer.

"Private use single-axle trailer" means a trailer owned by a natural person and used for the private noncommercial use of the owner.

[ 2010 c 161 s 132.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.